Connecticut, session 2026, HB05346.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General
Assembly convened:
Section 1. Subsection (b) of section 32-285a of the 2026 supplement to
the general statutes is repealed and the following is substituted in lieu
thereof (Effective from passage):
(b) (1) There is established a Community Investment Fund 2030
Board, which shall be within the Department of Economic and
Community Development. The board shall consist of the following
members:
(A) The speaker of the House of Representatives and the president
pro tempore of the Senate;
(B) The majority leader of the House of Representatives, the majority
leader of the Senate, the minority leader of the House of Representatives
and the minority leader of the Senate;
sHB5346 / File No. 240 1

sHB5346 File No. 240
(C) One appointed by the speaker of the House of Representatives
and one appointed by the president pro tempore of the Senate, each of
whom shall be a member of the Black and Puerto Rican Caucus of the
General Assembly;
(D) The two chairpersons of the general bonding subcommittee of the
joint standing committee of the General Assembly having cognizance of
matters relating to finance, revenue and bonding;
(E) Two appointed by the Governor; and
(F) The Secretary of the Office of Policy and Management, the
Attorney General, the Treasurer, the Comptroller, the Secretary of the
State and the Commissioners of Economic and Community
Development, Administrative Services, Social Services and Housing, or
their designees.
(2) All initial appointments shall be made not later than sixty days
after June 30, 2021. The terms of the members appointed by the
Governor shall be coterminous with the term of the Governor or until
their successors are appointed, whichever is later. Any vacancy in
appointments shall be filled by the appointing authority. Any vacancy
occurring other than by expiration of term shall be filled for the balance
of the unexpired term.
(3) Notwithstanding any provision of the general statutes, it shall not
constitute a conflict of interest for a trustee, director, partner, officer,
stockholder, proprietor, counsel or employee of any person to serve as
a member of the board, provided such trustee, director, partner, officer,
stockholder, proprietor, counsel or employee abstains and absents
himself or herself from any deliberation, action and vote by the board in
specific respect to such person. The members appointed by the
Governor shall be deemed public officials and shall adhere to the code
of ethics for public officials set forth in chapter 10.
(4) The speaker of the House of Representatives and the president pro
tempore of the Senate shall serve as the chairpersons of the board and
sHB5346 / File No. 240 2

sHB5346 File No. 240
shall schedule the first meeting of the board, which shall be held not
later than January 1, 2022. The board shall meet at least quarterly. Any
member who is unable to attend a meeting may, by notifying the
administrator in writing, designate another person to act as a proxy in
such member's absence.
(5) Eleven members of the board shall constitute a quorum for the
transaction of any business.
(6) The members of the board shall serve without compensation, but
shall, within the limits of available funds, be reimbursed for expenses
necessarily incurred in the performance of their duties.
(7) The board shall have the following powers and duties: (A) To
review eligible projects to be recommended to the Governor under
subsection (c) of this section for approval; (B) to establish bylaws to
govern its procedures; (C) to review and provide comments to the
Department of Economic and Community Development on projects
funded through the state's Economic Action Plan as provided under
section 32-4p; and (D) to perform such other acts as may be necessary
and appropriate to carry out its duties described in this section.
(8) The administrator shall hire such employee or employees as may
be necessary to assist the board to carry out its duties described in this
section.
This act shall take effect as follows and shall amend the following
sections:
Section 1 from passage 32-285a(b)
Statement of Legislative Commissioners:
In Section 1(b)(4), "by notifying" was added for clarity.
GAE Joint Favorable Subst. -LCO
sHB5346 / File No. 240 3

sHB5346 File No. 240
The following Fiscal Impact Statement and Bill Analysis are prepared for the benefit of the members of
the General Assembly, solely for purposes of information, summarization and explanation and do not
represent the intent of the General Assembly or either chamber thereof for any purpose. In general,
fiscal impacts are based upon a variety of informational sources, including the analyst’s professional
knowledge. Whenever applicable, agency data is consulted as part of the analysis, however final
products do not necessarily reflect an assessment from any specific department.
OFA Fiscal Note
State Impact: None
Municipal Impact: None
Explanation
The bill has no fiscal impact by authorizing Community Investment
Fund 2030 Board members to designate another person to act as a proxy
if a member is unable to attend a meeting. This is a procedural change
which does not impact the administration of the Board.
The Out Years
State Impact: None
Municipal Impact: None
sHB5346 / File No. 240 4

sHB5346 File No. 240
OLR Bill Analysis
HB 5346
AN ACT PERMITTING PROXY DESIGNATION FOR MEMBERS OF
THE COMMUNITY INVESTMENT FUND 2030 BOARD.